Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.040

Appointment of voting members—Positions.

Of the producer members, four shall be appointed from the first district and occupy positions one, two, three and four; four shall be appointed from the second district and occupy positions five, six, seven and eight, and two shall be appointed from the third district and occupy positions nine and ten.

Of the dealer members, two shall be appointed from each of the first and second districts and respectively occupy positions eleven and twelve from the first district and positions thirteen and fourteen from the second district.

The processor members shall be appointed from the state at large and occupy positions fifteen and sixteen. The dealer member position previously referred to as position twelve shall henceforth be position thirteen. The processor member position heretofore referred to as position fourteen shall cease to exist on March 21, 1967. The processor member position heretofore referred to as thirteen shall be known as position sixteen.

[ 2003 c 396 s 14; 1967 c 191 s 3; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.040. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.